src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!---------------> affixes
!! Verb inflection
!! ---------------

LEXICON V_IV 
+V+IV+Inf:%>ми # ;
+V+IV: ACCIDENTS ;

LEXICON V_TV 
+V+ТV+Inf:%>ми # ;
+V+TV: ACCIDENTS ;

LEXICON ACCIDENTS

+Prs: PERS_A_SG12 ; 
+Prs:%>р%{A%} PERS_A_REST ; 

+Prt:%>ч%{A%}%{ː%} PERS_B ; 
+Prt+Hab:%>ӈки PERS_B ; 
+Fut1:%>д%{Я%}ӈ%{A%}%{ː%}  PERS_B ; 

+Fut2:%>д%{Я%}ли PERS_A_SG12 ;
+Fut2:%>д%{Я%}лл%{A%} PERS_A_REST ;

+Fut3:%>д%{Я%}%{ː%} PERS_B ;

LEXICON PERS_A_SG12

+Sg1:%>м # ; 
+Sg2:%>нни # ; 

LEXICON PERS_A_REST
+Sg3:%>н # ; 

+Pl1:%>в # ; 
+Pl12:%>п # ; 
+Pl2:%>с # ; 
+Pl3: # ; 

LEXICON PERS_B

+Sg1:%>в # ; 
+Sg2:%>с # ; 
+Sg3:%>н # ; 

+Pl1:%>вун # ; 
+Pl12:%>т # ; 
+Pl2:%>сун # ; 
+Pl3:%>тын # ; 
