src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
!! !!!Verbs
!  -----

LEXICON Verbs

би:би V_IV ; ! "быть"
са̄:са%{ː%} V_TV ; ! "знать"
сса:сса V_TV ;
дукудями:дукудя V_TV ; ! "писать"
иридеми:ириде V_IV ; ! "варить"
гиркудями:гиркудя V_TV; ! "ходить"
адеми:аде V_IV ; ! "спать"
давладями:давладя V_TV ; ! "петь"
гэлэктэдеми:гэлэктэде V_TV ; ! "искать"
тэтыв:тэтыв V_TV ;
исми:ис V_IV ; ! "даити"
мелми:мел V_IV ; 
уӈми:уӈ V_IV ; 
гунми:гун V_TV ; 
оми:о  V_TV ; 
